Hawaii statutes.
[§199-1.5] Conservation and
resources enforcement special fund; established. (a) There is hereby
established in the state treasury a special fund known as the conservation and
resources enforcement special fund, which shall be administered by the department.

(b) The following shall be deposited into the
conservation and resources enforcement special fund:

(1) Grants, awards, donations, gifts, transfers, or
moneys derived from public or private sources for the purposes of enforcing the
provisions of title 12; chapters 6D, 6E, and 6K; or any rule adopted
thereunder;

(2) Fees, reimbursements, administrative charges, and
penalties collected for activities related to the enforcement of natural,
cultural, and historic resources protection laws and rules, except as otherwise
provided by law that provides for deposits into other special funds
administered by the department;

(3) Moneys derived from interest, dividends, or other
income from the above-mentioned sources; and

(4) Appropriations by the legislature to the special
fund.

(c) The conservation and resources enforcement
special fund shall be used for expenditures, including but not limited to:

(1) Training;

(2) Research;

(3) Equipment;

(4) Preparation and dissemination of information to
the public;

(5) Data collection and development;

(6) Information technology;

(7) Safety;

(8) Wireless communication;

(9) Management;

(10) Travel;

(11) Equipment rental;

(12) Repairs;

(13) Planning;

(14) Information;

(15) Education;

(16) Operations;

(17) Maintenance functions authorized and deemed
necessary by the department;

(18) Funding for consultants or contractual hires
related to the enforcement of:

(A) Title 12;

(B) Chapters 6D, 6E, and 6K; or

(C) Any rule adopted thereunder; and

(19) Work performed in cooperation with enforcement
authorities of the State, the counties, and the federal government.

(d) The fund shall be held separate and apart
from all other moneys, funds, and accounts in the department, except that any
moneys received from the federal government or from private contributions shall
be deposited and accounted for in accordance with conditions established by the
department and agencies or persons from whom the moneys are received. Any
balance remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year shall be carried
forward in the fund for the next fiscal year.

(e) As used in this section,
"department" means the department of land and natural resources. [L
2011, c 78, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next